Maryland, session 2026, HB1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–141.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1322*

HOUSE BILL 1322
(2) “CAMPUS COMMUNITY” MEANS THE STUDENTS,
ADMINISTRATORS, FACULTY, STAFF, AND INVITED GUESTS OF A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(3) (I) “EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY” MEANS ANY LAWFUL ORAL,
WRITTEN, AUDIO–VISUAL, OR ELECTRONIC MEANS BY WHICH INDIVIDUALS
COMMUNICATE IDEAS TO ONE ANOTHER.
(II) “EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY” INCLUDES PEACEFUL ASSEMBLY,
PROTESTS, SPEECHES, THE DISTRIBUTION OF LITERATURE, CARRYING SIGNS,
CIRCULATING PETITIONS, AND AUDIO–VISUAL RECORDING AND PUBLICATION.
(B) (1) ANY OUTDOOR AREA LOCATED ON ANY CAMPUS OF A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL BE CONSIDERED A PUBLIC FORUM FOR
MEMBERS OF THE CAMPUS COMMUNITY.
(2) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY NOT
DESIGNATE ANY AREA OF ITS CAMPUS AS A “FREE SPEECH ZONE” OR OTHERWISE
CREATE POLICIES TO RESTRICT EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITIES TO A PARTICULAR AREA OF
CAMPUS.
(C) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY MAINTAIN AND
ENFORCE TIME, PLACE, AND MANNER RESTRICTIONS ON EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY IN
THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE OUTDOOR AREAS OF CAMPUS AND IN INDOOR
LOCATIONS THAT THE INSTITUTION HAS OPENED FOR EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY ONLY
IF THE RESTRICTIONS ARE:
(1) REASONABLE;
(2) IN FURTHERANCE OF A SIGNIFICANT INSTITUTIONAL INTEREST;
(3) EMPLOY CLEAR, PUBLISHED, CONTENT– AND
VIEWPOINT–NEUTRAL CRITERIA;
(4) PROVIDE FOR AMPLE ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF EXPRESSION; AND
(5) ALLOW FOR MEMBERS OF THE CAMPUS COMMUNITY TO
SPONTANEOUSLY AND CONTEMPORANEOUSLY ASSEMBLE AND DISTRIBUTE
LITERATURE.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, A MEMBER OF THE CAMPUS COMMUNITY MAY ENGAGE IN

HOUSE BILL 1322 3
NONCOMMERCIAL EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY FREELY ON CAMPUS PROVIDED THAT THE
CAMPUS MEMBER’S CONDUCT AND DOES NOT MATERIALLY AND SUBSTANTIALLY
DISRUPT THE FUNCTIONING OF THE INSTITUTION.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE CAMPUS COMMUNITY MAY NOT ENGAGE IN
CONDUCT, WITH THE INTENT TO OR KNOWLEDGE OF DOING SO, THAT, MATERIALLY
AND SUBSTANTIALLY DISRUPTS ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL’S OR GROUP’S EXPRESSIVE
ACTIVITY, PREVENTS THE COMMUNICATION OF THE MESSAGE OR PREVENTS THE
TRANSACTION OF THE BUSINESS OF A LAWFUL MEETING, GATHERING, OR
PROCESSION BY:
(I) ENGAGING IN FIGHTING, VIOLENCE, OR SERIOUSLY
DISRUPTIVE BEHAVIOR; OR
(II) PHYSICALLY BLOCKING OR SIGNIFICANTLY HINDERING
ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL’S ABILITY TO ATTEND, LISTEN TO, VIEW, OR PARTICIPATE IN
AN EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO INCLUDE
CONDUCT THAT IS PROTECTED UNDER THE FIRST AMENDMENT OF THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION OR ARTICLE 40 OF THE DECLARATION OF RIGHTS OF THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, INCLUDING:
(I) LAWFUL PROTESTS AND COUNTER PROTESTS IN THE
OUTDOOR AREAS OF CAMPUS THAT ARE GENERALLY ACCESSIBLE TO THE MEMBERS
OF THE PUBLIC, PROVIDED THAT THOSE AREAS WERE NOT RESERVED IN ADVANCE
FOR OTHER EVENTS; AND
(II) MINOR, BRIEF, OR FLEETING NONVIOLENT DISRUPTIONS
OF EVENTS THAT ARE ISOLATED AND SHORT IN DURATION.
(E) (1) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY REQUIRE A
PERMIT FROM ANY INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP AS A CONDITION OF BEING GRANTED
EXCLUSIVE CONTROL OF A LOCATION FOR ITS EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY AT A RESERVED
TIME.
(2) THE PERMITTING PROCESS MAY NOT BE OVERLY BURDENSOME.
(3) APPLICATIONS FOR PERMITS SHALL BE EVALUATED SOLELY
USING PUBLISHED CONTENT– AND VIEWPOINT–NEUTRAL CRITERIA.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY CHARGE

HOUSE BILL 1322
SECURITY FEES AS PART OF AN APPLICATION FOR EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITIES THAT
REQUIRE A PERMIT.
(2) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY NOT CHARGE
SECURITY FEES BASED ON THE CONTENT OF EXPRESSION OR THE ANTICIPATED
REACTION TO THE EXPRESSION.
(3) WHETHER A SECURITY FEE IS REQUIRED AND THE AMOUNT OF
THE SECURITY FEE SHALL BE DETERMINED BASED ON CONTENT– AND
VIEWPOINT–NEUTRAL CRITERIA, INCLUDING THE TIME OF THE EVENT, THE
LOCATION OF THE EVENT, THE ANTICIPATED SIZE OF THE INVITED AUDIENCE, AND
WHETHER ALCOHOL WILL BE SERVED.
(4) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT CHARGES
SECURITY FEES SHALL PUBLISH THE CRITERIA USED TO ASSESS THE FEES.
(G) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY PROVIDE
RESOURCES TO STUDENTS THAT ARE AFFECTED BY SPEECH THAT CANNOT BE
SANCTIONED UNDER THE FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION,
ARTICLE 40 OF THE DECLARATION OF RIGHTS OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION,
OR THIS SECTION, AND MAY TAKE OTHER NONPUNITIVE ACTIONS THAT FOSTER
RESILIENCE OR ACHIEVE PEDAGOGICAL GOALS.
(H) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR ANY PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND ANY OF ITS EMPLOYEES ACTING IN THEIR
OFFICIAL CAPACITIES WHO ARE RESPONSIBLE FOR THE VIOLATION.
(2) (I) IF A COURT FINDS THAT A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION OR ANY OF ITS EMPLOYEES ACTING IN THEIR OFFICIAL CAPACITIES
VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL ISSUE AN AWARD TO THE AGGRIEVED
INDIVIDUAL OF:
1. $500 OR GREATER FOR THE INITIAL VIOLATION;
2. $50 FOR EACH DAY THAT THE VIOLATION REMAINS
ONGOING, BEGINNING THE DAY AFTER THE COMPLAINT IS SERVED TO THE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION; AND
3. ANY OTHER RELIEF THE COURT DEEMS
APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING COMPENSATORY DAMAGES, REASONABLE COURT COSTS,
AND ATTORNEY’S FEES.

HOUSE BILL 1322 5
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CIVIL PENALTIES IMPOSED ON A
PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY NOT EXCEED $100,000, EXCLUDING COURT COSTS AND ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(III) FOR VIOLATIONS WITH MULTIPLE AGGRIEVED
INDIVIDUALS, THE COURT SHALL DIVIDE THE AWARD EQUITABLY.
(3) (I) ANY ACTION ALLEGING A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE ALLEGED
VIOLATION OCCURS.
(II) EACH DAY THAT THE ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
PERSISTS, AND EACH DAY THAT A POLICY IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION REMAINS
IN EFFECT, SHALL CONSTITUTE A NEW DAY THAT THE CAUSE OF ACTION ACCRUES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.